Montana, session 2025, HB358.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 19-17-404, MCA, is amended to read:
"19-17-404. Amount of pension benefits. (1) A member is eligible to receive a pension benefit as
provided in this section.
(2) (a) Except as provided in subsection (2)(c), the full pension benefit paid to an eligible member
is $175 $200 a month.
(b) A partial pension benefit paid to an eligible member is calculated by multiplying the full pension
benefit in subsection (2)(a) by a fraction, the numerator of which is the eligible member's years of service and
the denominator of which is 20.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (3), the full pension benefit of a member who continued to be
an active member after completing 20 years of service must be increased by $7.50 a month for each additional
year of active service the member completed after 20 years of service, up to 30 total years of service.
(3) (a) Subject to subsection (3)(b), the pension benefit of a member who continues to be a
member after completing 30 years of credited service must be increased by $7.50 a month for each additional
year of credited service after 30 years if the pension trust fund is actuarially sound and the amortization period
for any unfunded liabilities remains 20 years or less.
(b) A member does not have a contract right to any additional pension benefits received pursuant
to subsection (3)(a), and the member's monthly benefit must be reduced to the amount provided under
subsection (2)(c) if the amortization period for the unfunded liabilities is greater than 20 years.
(c) This subsection (3) applies only to members who retire after July 1, 2011."
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 358
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 358
Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 358
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 358, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 358
INTRODUCED BY S. FYANT, J. REAVIS, L. MUSZKIEWICZ, B. EDWARDS, J. ISALY, J. SECKINGER, B.
CLOSE, C. NEUMANN, J. WEBER, J. SOOKTIS, D. POWERS, M. CUNNINGHAM, W. CURDY, M.
DUNWELL, J. ELLIS, B. GILLESPIE, G. HUNTER, J. MORIGEAU, T. RUNNING WOLF, D. FERN, D.
HARVEY, G. LAMMERS, L. SMITH, K. ZOLNIKOV, L. DEMING, B. USHER, D. BAUM, E. BOLDMAN, L.
BREWSTER, B. CARTER, J. COHENOUR, P. FLOWERS, D. HAYMAN, K. KORTUM, S. MORIGEAU, A.
OLSEN, E. STAFMAN, S. DEMAROIS, D. JOY
AN ACT INCREASING THE MONTHLY PENSION BENEFIT FOR THE VOLUNTEER FIREFIGHTERS'
COMPENSATION ACT; AMENDING SECTION 19-17-404, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN EFFECTIVE DATE.